Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 21.2 Prepaid Wireless Charge Act

39-21.2-1.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Prepaid Wireless Charge Act of 2010.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 12; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 7, § 10.

39-21.2-2.
Findings.

The legislature finds that:

Maintaining effective and efficient emergency services across the state benefits all citizens;

911 fees imposed upon the consumers of telecommunications services that have the ability to dial 911 are an important funding mechanism to assist state and local governments with the deployment of emergency services to the citizens of this state;

Prepaid wireless telecommunication services are an important segment of the telecommunications industry and have proven particularly attractive to low-income, low-volume consumers;

Unlike traditional telecommunications services, prepaid wireless telecommunications services are not sold or used pursuant to term contracts or subscriptions, and monthly bills are not sent to consumers by prepaid wireless telecommunication services providers or retail vendors;

Prepaid wireless consumers have the same access to emergency 911 services from their wireless devices as wireless consumers on term contracts, and prepaid wireless consumers benefit from the ability to access the 911 system by dialing 911;

Consumers purchase prepaid wireless telecommunication services at a wide variety of general retail locations and other distribution channels, not just through service providers;

Such purchases are made on a “cash-and-carry” or “pay-as-you-go” basis from retailers; and

To ensure equitable contributions to the funding of emergency systems from consumers of prepaid wireless telecommunication services, the collection and payment obligation of charges to support E-911 should be imposed upon the consumer’s retail purchase of the prepaid wireless telecommunication service and should be in the form of a single, statewide charge that is collected once at the time of purchase directly from the consumer, remitted to the state, and distributed to E-911 authorities pursuant to state law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 12; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 7, § 10; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 2, § 9.

39-21.2-3.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Consumer” means a person who purchases prepaid wireless telecommunications service in a retail transaction.

“Division” means the division of taxation.

“Prepaid wireless charge” means the charge that is required to be collected by a seller from a consumer in the amount established under §

39-21.2-4

.

“Prepaid wireless telecommunications service” means a wireless telecommunications service that allows a caller to dial 911 to access the 911 system, which service must be paid for in advance and is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount.

“Provider” means a person who or that provides prepaid wireless telecommunications service pursuant to a license issued by the Federal Communications Commission.

“Retail transaction” means the purchase of prepaid wireless telecommunications service from a seller for any purpose other than resale.

“Seller” means a person who or that sells prepaid wireless telecommunications service to another person.

“Wireless telecommunications service” means commercial mobile radio service as defined by 47 C.F.R. § 20.3, as amended.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 12; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 7, § 10; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 14.

39-21.2-4.
E-911 surcharge.

Amount of charge. The prepaid wireless E-911 charge is hereby levied at the rate of two and one-half percent (2.5%) per retail transaction.

Collection of charge. The prepaid wireless charge shall be collected by the seller from the consumer with respect to each retail transaction occurring in this state. The amount of the prepaid wireless charge shall be either separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document that is provided to the consumer by the seller, or otherwise disclosed to the consumer.

Application of charge. For purposes of subsection (b) of this section, a retail transaction that is effected in person by a consumer at a business location of the seller shall be treated as occurring in this state if that business location is in this state, and any other retail transaction shall be treated as occurring in this state if the retail transaction is treated as occurring in this state for purposes of chapter 18 of title 44.

Liability for charge. The prepaid wireless charge is the liability of the consumer and not of the seller or of any provider, except that the seller shall be liable to remit all prepaid wireless charges that the seller collects from consumers as provided in §

39-21.2-5

, including all such charges that the seller is deemed to collect where the amount of the charge has not been separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document provided to the consumer by the seller.

Exclusion of charge from base of other taxes and fees. The amount of the prepaid wireless charge that is collected by a seller from a consumer, if such amount is separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document provided to the consumer by the seller, shall not be included in the base for measuring any tax, fee, surcharge, or other charge that is imposed by this state, any political subdivision of this state, or any intergovernmental agency, including, but not limited to, the tax imposed under chapter 18 of title 44, nor be included within the telephone common carrier’s gross earnings for the purpose of computing the tax under chapter 13 of title 44.

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 2, § 9.]

Bundled transactions. When prepaid wireless telecommunications service is sold with one or more other products or services for a single, non-itemized price, then the percentage specified in subsection (a) of this section shall apply to the entire non-itemized prices unless the seller elects to apply the percentage (1) If the amount of prepaid wireless telecommunications service is disclosed to the consumer as a dollar amount, the dollar amount, or (2) If the retailer can identify the portion of the price that is attributable to the prepaid wireless telecommunications service, by reasonable and verifiable standards from its books and records that are kept in the regular course of business for other purposes, including, but not limited to, non-tax purposes, the portion.

However, if a minimal amount of prepaid wireless telecommunications service is sold with a prepaid wireless device for a single, non-itemized price, then the seller may elect not to apply the percentage specified in subsection (a) of this section to such transaction. For purposes of this paragraph, an amount of service denominated as ten (10) minutes or less, or five dollars ($5.00) or less, is minimal.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 12; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 7, § 10; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 2, § 9; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 14.

39-21.2-5.
Administration of E-911 charge.

Time and manner of payment. Prepaid wireless E-911 charges collected by sellers shall be remitted to the division at the times and in the manner provided by the streamlined sales and use tax as described in §

44-18.1-34

. The division shall establish registration and payment procedures that substantially coincide with the registration and payment procedures that apply to the streamlined sales and use tax.

Seller administrative deduction. A seller shall be permitted to deduct and retain one percent (1%) of prepaid wireless E-911 charges that are collected by the seller from consumers.

Audit and appeal procedures. The audit and appeal procedures applicable to sales and use tax under chapter 19 of title 44 shall apply to prepaid wireless E-911 charges.

Exemption documentation. The division shall establish procedures by which a seller of prepaid wireless telecommunications service may document that a sale is not a retail transaction, which procedures shall substantially coincide with the procedures for documenting sale for resale transactions for sales tax purposes under §

44-18-25

.

All E-911 fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a restricted-receipt account and used solely for the operation of the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 12; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 2, § 9; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 14.

39-21.2-6.
Liability.

No liability regarding 911 service.
No provider or seller of prepaid wireless telecommunications service shall be liable for damages to any person resulting from or incurred in connection with the provision of, or failure to provide, 911 or E-911 service, or for identifying, or failing to identify, the telephone number, address, location, or name associated with any person or device that is accessing or attempting to access 911 or E-911 service.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 12.

39-21.2-7.
Exclusivity of prepaid wireless charge.

The prepaid wireless charge imposed by this act shall be the only E-911 funding obligation imposed with respect to prepaid wireless telecommunications service in this state, and no tax, fee, surcharge, or other charge shall be imposed by this state, any political subdivision of this state, or any intergovernmental agency, for E-911 funding purposes, upon any provider, seller, or consumer with respect to the sale, purchase, use, or provision of prepaid wireless telecommunications service.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 12; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 7, § 10.